Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-821.01
Illegal overcharge or undercharge case.

In an illegal overcharge or undercharge case in which claims are asserted by both parties who dealt directly with the defendant and parties who dealt indirectly with the defendant or any combination thereof:

(1) A defendant may prove, as a partial or complete defense to a claim for damages under sections 59-801 to 59-831 and this section, that the illegal overcharge or undercharge has been passed on to others who are themselves entitled to recover so as to avoid duplication of recovery of such damages; and

(2) The court may transfer and consolidate such claims, apportion damages, and delay disbursement of damages to avoid multiplicity of suits and duplication of recovery of damages and to obtain substantial fairness.

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 11.